Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska2-3234.09
Trails; decision of district board;
appeal.

An
affected private real property owner may appeal the decision of the district
board to use eminent domain under sections 2-3234.02 to 2-3234.09 by petition
in error to the district court of the county where the affected private real
property is located. No petition to condemn private real property affected
by the proposed trail shall be filed in county court until any error proceeding
under this section is final.

Laws 2010, LB1010, § 8.